New Jersey, session 221, A1515.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: "Community-based residential program" means a group home or supervised apartment, which is licensed and regulated by the Department of Human Services. "Developmental disability" means the same as that term is defined by section 3 of P.L.1977, c.82 (C.30:6D-3). "Group home" means a living arrangement that is operated in a residence or residences leased or owned by a licensee; which provides the opportunity for individuals with developmental disabilities to live together in a home, sharing in chores and the overall management of the residence; and in which staff provide supervision, training, or assistance in a variety of forms and intensity as required to assist the individuals as they move toward independence. "Long-term care facility" means a nursing home, assisted living residence, comprehensive personal care home, residential health care facility, rehabilitation facility, or dementia care home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). 2.    The parent, legal guardian, or authorized representative of a resident of a community-based residential program or a long-term care facility shall be granted, at all times, online Internet access to an updated record of the residents medical and personal history during the period of residence at the facility, which shall include: all medications, procedures, tests, and treatments administered to the resident within and outside the facility, important incidents or information related to the resident such as a fall, loss of function, significant ailment or injury, or conflicts with other residents or staff. 3.    The Commissioners of Health and Human Services may jointly or separately adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), if necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect 90 days following the date of enactment.